Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.022

Privacy or confidentiality of any information or material—Federal or other state's laws.

(1) The requirements under any federal law or laws of another state regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the department [of financial institutions], and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to that information or material, continues to apply to the information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the department [of financial institutions]. If consistent with applicable law, the information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law or state law.

(2) When the department [of financial institutions] is a party to a memoranda of understanding or enforcement order issued by the consumer financial protection bureau, the privacy, confidentiality, or privilege accorded to the document by federal law continues to apply even after the memoranda or order has been signed by the director or a designee.

(3) Any requirement under chapter 42.56 RCW relating to the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or any information or material described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section that is inconsistent with subsection (1) or (2) of this section is superseded by the requirements of this section.

[ 2014 c 36 s 8.]